Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,264
Venue.

The district court of the county in which the facility is located or, if all parties agree, the district court of Lancaster County shall have jurisdiction of actions brought under section 25-21,259.

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 11.